South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3324.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 10 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 10-1-220.  Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 2-1-240, there is hereby established on the grounds of the State House an African American Confederate Veterans Monument. The design and location of the monument shall be determined by the commission appointed pursuant to Section 10-1-230. The commission shall make reasonable efforts to incorporate the names of Charles Dougherty Hayne and all African American Confederate veterans on this monument. The monument must be erected as soon as is reasonably possible after the design plan has been approved by the General Assembly by concurrent resolution. Section 10-1-230.  (A) An African American Confederate Veterans Monument Commission is created to determine the design of the monument to Charles Dougherty Hayne and all African American Confederate veterans and its location on the State House grounds. The commission is empowered and directed to raise private funds and may receive gifts and grants to carry out its purpose. The commission has the power to create a tax-exempt nonprofit corporation for the purpose of receiving and disbursing funds for the monument. The staff of the Department of Administration shall assist with the preparation and maintenance of financial records. The financial records are public records except that the names of anonymous donors must not be disclosed. (B) The commission is composed of eleven members, including: (1) the Chairman of the South Carolina Confederate Relic Room and Military Museum or his designee, to serve as chairman of the commission; (2) five members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and (3) five members appointed by the President of the Senate. (C) The commission shall consult with the South Carolina Confederate Relic Room and Military Museum to determine and confirm the names of African American Confederate veterans to be placed on the monument. (D) By July 1, 2025, the commission must report the proposed design and location of the monument to the State House Committee for its approval. (E) The commission is dissolved on January 1, 2029. The commission must be dissolved earlier if the monument is dedicated and the final report is made before the dissolution date. If the African American Confederate Veterans Monument has not been dedicated by January 1, 2029, the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the commission must be transferred to the State House Committee. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----